Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 36 SALES TAX
§ 63-3622K. Occasional sales.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter occasional sales of tangible personal property.

As used in this section, the term “occasional sale” means:

A sale of property not held or used by a person in the course of an activity for which he is required to hold a seller’s permit, provided such sale is not one (1) of a series of sales sufficient in number or of such a nature as to constitute the seller a “retailer” under section 63-3610(c), Idaho Code. The definition of “occasional sales” provided in this subsection does not apply to use tax in regard to tangible personal property used to improve real property when such property is obtained, directly or indirectly, from a person in the business of making like or similar improvements to real property.

Any transfer of all or substantially all of the property held or used by a person in a business requiring a seller’s permit when, after such transfer, the real or ultimate ownership of such property is substantially similar to that which existed before such transfer. For the purpose of this section, stockholders, bondholders, partners, or other persons holding an interest in a corporation or other entity are regarded as having a “real or ultimate ownership” of the property of such corporation or other entity.

A transfer of capital assets to or by a business when the transfer is accomplished through an adjustment of the beneficial interest of the business and the transferor has paid sales or use taxes pursuant to section 63-3619 or 63-3621, Idaho Code, on the capital assets, incidental to:

A division of joint venture, partnership, or limited liability company assets among the members or partners in exchange for a proportional reduction of the transferee’s interest in the joint venture, partnership, or limited liability company. For the purposes of this section, the term “limited liability company” means a business organization as defined in chapter 6, title 53, Idaho Code, or as defined in section 30-6-102, Idaho Code, as appropriate pursuant to section 30-6-1104, Idaho Code;

The formation of a partnership, joint venture, or limited liability company by the transfer of assets to the partnership, joint venture, or limited liability company or transfers to a partnership, joint venture, or limited liability company in exchange for proportionate interests in the partnership, joint venture, or limited liability company;

The formation of a corporation by the owners of a business and the transfer of their business assets to the corporation in exchange for stock in proportion to assets contributed;

The transfer of assets of shareholders in the formation or dissolution of a corporation;

The transfer of capital assets by a corporation to its stockholders in exchange for surrender of capital stock;

The transfer of assets from a parent corporation to a subsidiary corporation which is owned at least eighty percent (80%) by the parent corporation, which transfer is solely in exchange for stock or securities of the subsidiary corporation;

The transfer of assets from a subsidiary corporation which is owned at least eighty percent (80%) by the parent corporation to a parent corporation or another subsidiary which is owned at least eighty percent (80%) by the parent corporation, which transfer is solely in exchange for stock or securities of the parent corporation or the subsidiary which received the assets.
(4) The sale, lease or rental of a capital asset in substantially the same form as acquired by the transferor and on which the initial transferor has paid sales or use taxes pursuant to section 63-3619 or 63-3621, Idaho Code, when the owners of all of the outstanding stock, equity or interest of the transferor are the same as the transferee or are members of the same family within the second degree of consanguinity or affinity.

As used in this section, the term “occasional sale,” when applied to the sale of a motor vehicle, means only:

Sales of motor vehicles between members of a family related within the second degree of consanguinity, unless a sales or use tax was not imposed on the sale of that motor vehicle at the time of purchase, in which situation the sale is taxable.

Sales of motor vehicles that fall within the scope of the transactions detailed in subsection (b)(2) through (b)(5) of this section.

The exemption provided by subsection (b)(1), (b)(4), (b)(6) or (b)(8) of this section shall not apply to the sale, purchase or use of aircraft, as defined in section 21-201, Idaho Code, nor shall it apply to the sale, purchase or use of boats or vessels, as defined in section 67-7003, Idaho Code, nor shall it apply to the sale, purchase or use of snowmobiles, recreational vehicles or off-highway motorbikes, as defined in section 63-3622HH, Idaho Code.

(5) The sale of substantially all of the operating assets of a business or of a separate division, branch, or identifiable segment to a buyer who continues operation of the business. For the purpose of this subsection, a “separate division, branch, or identifiable segment” shall be deemed to exist if, prior to its sale, the income and expense attributable to such “separate division, branch, or identifiable segment” could be separately ascertained from the books of accounts and records.

(6) Sales by persons who are not defined as “retailers” in section 63-3610, Idaho Code.

(7) Sales of animals by any 4-H club or FFA club held in conjunction with a fair or the western Idaho spring lamb sale.

(8) The sale or purchase of tangible personal property at home yard sales; provided however, that no more than two (2) such home yard sales per individual calendar year shall be exempt.

§ 63-3622L. De minimis sales.

There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale of articles through a coin-operated vending machine for a total consideration of eleven cents ($.11) or less and individual transactions involving a total sales price of eleven cents ($.11) or less.

§ 63-3622M. Liquor sales.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter sales of liquor by the state liquor division to a person licensed under the provisions of chapter 9, title 23, Idaho Code, for resale as liquor by-the-drink.

§ 63-3622N. Prescriptions.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the following when administered or distributed by a practitioner or when purchased by or on behalf of an individual for use by such individual under a prescription or work order of a practitioner:

Drugs, hypodermic syringes, insulin, insulin syringes, artificial eyes, eyeglasses and eyeglass component parts, contact lenses, hearing aids, hearing aid parts and hearing aid accessories;

Drugs and supplies used in hemodialysis and peritoneal dialysis;

Braces and other orthopedic appliances;

Dental prostheses and other orthodontic appliances, including fillings;

Catheters, urinary accessories, colostomy supplies, and other prosthetic devices which shall include, but are not limited to, enteral and parenteral feeding equipment and supplies, (tubing, pumps, containers) catheter devices and supplies;

Equipment and devices or chemical reagents which are used to test or monitor blood or urine of a diabetic;

Other durable medical equipment and devices and related parts and supplies specifically designed for those products which shall include, but are not limited to: oxygen equipment, oxygen cylinders, cylinder transport devices (sheaths, carts), cylinder stands, support devices, regulators, flowmeters, tank wrench, oxygen concentrators, liquid oxygen base dispenser, liquid oxygen portable dispenser, oxygen tubing, nasal cannulas, face masks, oxygen humidifiers, oxygen fittings and accessories, respiratory therapy equipment, room humidifiers, aspirators, aerosol compressors (stationary and portable), ultrasonic nebulizers, volume ventilators, respirators and related device supplies, percussors, vibrators, IPPB, circuits, devices and supplies, air oxygen mixers, manual resuscitators, nebulizers, tubing, emergency oxygen delivery units, patient care equipment, physical and occupational therapy items, hospital beds, trapeze bars and bar stand, bed rails, geriatric chairs, lift recliners, bedside commodes, overbed tables, patient lifts, patient lift slings, traction stands and pulleys, shower seating, shower grip bars, raised toilet seats, toilet safety frames, walking canes, quad canes and accessories, walkers, wheeled walkers, walker accessories, I.V. stands, crawlers, posture back supports for seating, posture back supports, wheelchairs, crutches, crutch pads, tips, grips, restraints, standing frame devices and accessories, hand exercise equipment and putty, specially designed hand utensils, leg weights, paraffin baths, hydrocollators, hydrotherm heating pads, communication aids for physically impaired, specialized seating, desks, work stations, foam wedges, writing and speech aids for the impaired, dressing aids, button loops and zipper aids, grooming aids, dental aids, eating and drinking aids, splints, holders, household aids for the impaired, shampoo trays, reaching aids, foam seating pads, decubitus seating pads, bed pads, fitted stroller, alternating pressure pads and pumps, stethoscope, sphygmomanometers, otoscopes, sitting and sleeping cushions, patient transport devices, boards, stairglides, lifts in home, transcutaneous nerve stimulators, muscle stimulators and bone fracture therapy devices.

The term “practitioner” means a physician, physician assistant, surgeon, podiatrist, chiropractor, dentist, optometrist, psychologist, ophthalmologist, nurse practitioner, denturist, orthodontist, audiologist, hearing aid dealer or fitter or any person licensed by the state under title 54, Idaho Code, to prescribe, administer or distribute items identified in subsection (a) of this section.
(c) The term “drug” means a drug which is:

Defined in section 54-1705, Idaho Code; and

Either:

Listed in a drug compendia which the state board of pharmacy requires to be maintained by Idaho licensed pharmacies; or

The use of which requires a prescription under state or federal law. The term shall not include articles intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in animals other than man.

Generally is not useful to a person in the absence of illness or injury; and

Is appropriate for use in the home.

(d) The term “durable medical equipment” means equipment which:

(1) Can withstand repeated use;

(2) Is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose;

(e) The term “prosthetic device” means a device which replaces a missing part or function of the human body and shall include any supplies physically connected to such devices.

§ 63-3622O. Exempt private and public organizations.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter:

Sales to or purchases by hospitals, health-related entities, educational institutions, forest protective associations and canal companies that are nonprofit organizations; and

Donations to, sales to, and purchases by the Idaho Foodbank Warehouse, Inc.; and

Donations to, sales to, and purchases by food banks or soup kitchens of food or other tangible personal property used by food banks or soup kitchens in the growing, storage, preparation or service of food, but not including motor vehicles or trailers; and

Sales of clothes to, donations of clothes to, and purchases of clothes by nonsale clothiers; and

Sales to or purchases by centers for independent living; and

Sales to or purchases by the state of Idaho and its agencies and its political subdivisions; and

Sales to or purchases by volunteer fire departments or licensed emergency medical service agencies; and

Sales to or purchases by a qualifying senior citizen center; and

Sales to or purchases by the Blind Services Foundation, Inc.; and

Donations to, sales to or purchases by the Advocates for Survivors of Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault, Inc., a nonprofit corporation; and

Sales to or purchases by nonprofit organizations offering free dental clinic services to children; and

Admissions to and purchases by museums, as defined in subsection (2) of this section.

As used in this section, these words shall have the following meanings:

“Educational institution” shall mean nonprofit colleges, universities, public charter schools organized pursuant to chapter 52, title 33, Idaho Code, the Idaho digital learning academy established pursuant to chapter 55, title 33, Idaho Code, and other primary and secondary schools, the income of which is devoted solely to education and in which systematic instruction in the usual branches of learning is given. This definition does not include schools primarily teaching business, dancing, dramatics, music, cosmetology, writing, gymnastics, exercise and other special accomplishments nor parent-teacher associations, parent groups, alumni or other auxiliary organizations with purposes related to the educational function of an institution or collective group of institutions.

“Hospital” shall include nonprofit institutions licensed by the state for the care of ill persons. It shall not extend to nursing homes or similar institutions.

“Health-related entities” shall mean the Idaho Cystic Fibrosis Foundation, Idaho Epilepsy League, Idaho Lung Association, March of Dimes, American Cancer Society, Camp Rainbow Gold, Mental Health Association, The Arc, The Children’s Home Society of Idaho, American Heart Association, Idaho Ronald McDonald House, United Cerebral Palsy, Arthritis Foundation, Muscular Dystrophy Foundation, National Multiple Sclerosis Society, Rocky Mountain Kidney Association, American Diabetes Association, Easter Seals, Idaho Community Action Agencies, Idaho Primary Care Association and community health centers that are members of the Idaho Primary Care Association, the Idaho Association of Free and Charitable Clinics and its member clinics, the Idaho Diabetes Youth Programs, Special Olympics Idaho, the Idaho Women’s and Children’s Alliance, and the Family Services Alliance of Southeast Idaho, together with said entities’ local or regional chapters or divisions.

“Canal companies” shall include nonprofit corporations that are incorporated solely for the purpose of operating and maintaining and are engaged solely in operation and maintenance of dams, reservoirs, canals, lateral and drainage ditches, pumps or pumping plants.

“Forest protective associations” shall mean associations whose purpose is the furnishing, operating and maintaining of a protective system for the detection, prevention and suppression of forest or range fires. Forest protective associations shall include only those associations with which the state of Idaho has contracted or become a member of pursuant to chapter 1, title 38, Idaho Code.

“Food banks or soup kitchens” shall mean any nonprofit corporation or association, other than the Idaho Foodbank Warehouse, Inc., one of whose regular activities is the furnishing or providing of food or food products to others without charge.

“Nonsale clothier” shall mean any nonprofit corporation or association, one of whose primary purposes is the furnishing or providing of clothes to others without charge.

“Clothes” shall mean garments in general, designed or intended to be worn by humans, and shall include footwear in addition to wearing apparel.

“Center for independent living” shall mean a private, nonprofit, nonresidential organization in which at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the principal governing board, management and staff are individuals with disabilities and that:

Is designed and operated within a local community by individuals with disabilities;

Provides an array of independent living services and programs; and

Is cross-disability.

“Political subdivision” means:

A governmental organization that:

Embraces a certain territory,

Is organized for public advantage and not in the interest of private individuals or classes,

Has been delegated functions of government, and

Has the statutory power to levy taxes; or

A public health district created by section 39-408, Idaho Code; or

A soil conservation district as defined in section 22-2717, Idaho Code; or

A drainage district created pursuant to chapter 29, title 42, Idaho Code; or

An irrigation district created pursuant to title 43, Idaho Code; or

A state grazing board created by section 57-1204, Idaho Code; or

A water measurement district created pursuant to section 42-705 or 42-706, Idaho Code; or

A ground water management district created pursuant to chapter 51, title 42, Idaho Code.

“Agency of the state of Idaho” shall mean an office or organization created by the constitution or statutes of this state and constituting a component part of the executive, judicial or legislative branch of the government of this state.

“Volunteer fire department” means an entity exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and which primarily provides fire protection or fire prevention on a not-for-profit basis to surrounding residents.

“Licensed emergency medical service agency” means an emergency medical service (EMS) licensed by the EMS bureau of the department of health and welfare and which is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and which provides emergency medical services on a not-for-profit basis to surrounding residents.
(n) “Qualifying senior citizen center” means an entity exempt from income tax pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and which is a community facility for the organization and provision of a broad spectrum of services, which shall include provision of health, including mental health, social, nutritional, and educational services and the provision of facilities for recreational activities for older individuals.

The exemption granted by subsection (1)(f) of this section does not include any association or other organization whose members are political subdivisions or state agencies unless the organization is expressly created under the joint powers provision of sections 67-2328 through 67-2333, Idaho Code.

The exemptions granted by subsection (1) of this section do not include the use of tangible personal property by a contractor used to improve real property of an exempt entity when such use is within the definition provided by section 63-3615(b), Idaho Code, whether the use tax liability is included in a contract total or stated separately in a contract.

There is exempted from the taxes imposed in this chapter the renting of a place to sleep to an individual by the Idaho Ronald McDonald House.

(o) “Museum” means a public institution or an entity exempt from income tax pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, which stores, preserves and exhibits objects of art, history, science or other objects of historical, educational or cultural value on a permanent basis in a building, portion of a building or outdoor location and which provides museum services to the public on a regular basis.

§ 63-3622P. Purchases shipped out-of-state by a common carrier.

There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale or purchase of tangible personal property shipped by the seller via the purchasing carrier under a bill of lading whether the freight is paid in advance, or the shipment is made freight charges collect, to a point outside this state if the property is actually transported to the out-of-state destination for use by the carrier in the conduct of its business as a common carrier.

§ 63-3622Q. Out-of-state shipments.

There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale or purchase of tangible personal property which is shipped to a point outside this state for use outside this state pursuant to a contract of sale by delivery by the vendor to such point by means of:

Facilities operated by the vendor;

Delivery by the vendor to a carrier for shipment to a consignee at such point; or

Delivery by the vendor to a customs broker or forwarding agent for shipment outside this state.

§ 63-3622R. Motor vehicles, used manufactured homes, vessels, all-terrain vehicles, trailers, utility type vehicles, specialty off-highway vehicles, off-road motorcycles, snowmobiles and glider kits.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter:

Sales to nonresidents of motor vehicles, trailers, vessels, all-terrain vehicles (ATVs), utility type vehicles (UTVs), specialty off-highway vehicles (SOHVs), motorcycles intended for off-road use and snowmobiles, for use outside of this state even though delivery be made within this state, but only when:

The motor vehicles, vessels, ATVs, UTVs, SOHVs, motorcycles intended for off-road use, snowmobiles or trailers will be taken from the point of delivery in this state directly to a point outside this state; and

The motor vehicles, vessels, ATVs, UTVs, SOHVs, motorcycles intended for off-road use, snowmobiles and trailers will be registered immediately under the laws of another state, will be titled in another state if required to be titled in that state, will not be used in this state more than ninety (90) days in any twelve (12) month period, and will not be required to be titled under the laws of this state.

For the purpose of this subsection, the terms “all-terrain vehicle” or “ATV,” “utility type vehicle” or “UTV,” and “specialty off-highway vehicle” or “SOHV” mean all-terrain vehicle or ATV, utility type vehicle or UTV, and specialty off-highway vehicle or SOHV as defined in section 67-7101, Idaho Code.

For the purpose of this section, the term “vessel” means any boat intended to carry one (1) or more persons upon the water which is either:

Sold together with a motor; or

Eleven (11) feet in length or more, but shall not include canoes, kayaks, paddleboards, inflatable boats or similar watercraft, unless such canoes, kayaks, paddleboards, inflatable boats or similar watercraft are sold together with a motor.

Sale of used manufactured homes, whether or not such used manufactured homes are sold for use outside this state, and whether or not such used manufactured homes are sold by a dealer. Every manufactured home sale after its sale as a “new manufactured home,” as defined in section 63-3606, Idaho Code, is a sale as a used manufactured home.

Sale or lease of motor vehicles with a maximum gross registered weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds, which shall be immediately registered under the international registration plan, whether or not base plated in Idaho, and the sale or lease of trailers which are part of a fleet of vehicles registered under the international registration plan when such vehicles and trailers are substantially used in interstate commerce. If such a motor vehicle or trailer is not substantially used in interstate commerce during any four (4) fiscal year quarters beginning July 1 and ending June 30 of each year under the international registration plan, it shall be deemed used in Idaho and subject to the use tax under section 63-3621, Idaho Code. For the purpose of this subsection, “substantially used in interstate commerce” means that the vehicles or trailers will be part of a fleet with a minimum of ten percent (10%) of the miles operated by the fleet accrued outside of Idaho in any four (4) fiscal year quarters beginning July 1 and ending June 30 of each year under the international registration plan.

The sale or purchase of a glider kit when the glider kit will be used to assemble a glider kit vehicle as defined in section 49-123, Idaho Code, which will be immediately registered under a plan defined in subsection (c) of this section, provided that if the glider kit vehicle is not substantially used in interstate commerce as defined in subsection (c) of this section during any registration period, it shall be subject to the use tax under section 63-3621, Idaho Code.
(e) The use or other consumption of a motor vehicle temporarily donated to a driver’s education program sponsored by a nonprofit educational institution as defined in section 63-3622O, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3622S. Radio and television broadcasting equipment.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter receipts from the sale, storage, use or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property directly used and consumed in the production and broadcasting of radio and television programs when the purchase, storage, use or other consumption is by a business or segment of a business which is primarily devoted to such production and broadcasting, provided, that the use or consumption of such tangible personal property is necessary or essential to the performance of such operation. This exemption does not include machinery, equipment, materials and supplies used in a manner that is incidental to the production and broadcasting operation, such as maintenance and janitorial equipment and supplies; nor does it include tangible personal property used in any activities other than actual production and broadcasting operations such as office equipment and supplies, equipment and supplies used in selling and distributing activities, in research, or in transportation activities; nor shall this exemption include motor vehicles or aircraft, without regard to the use to which such motor vehicles or aircraft are put.

§ 63-3622T. Equipment to produce certain newspapers.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter:

Receipts from the sale, storage, use or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property directly used and consumed in the production of publications in a newspaper format which are distributed to the public at large and which rely on advertising revenue as their primary source of income; provided, that the purchase, storage, use or other consumption is by a business or segment of a business which is primarily devoted to such production of said publications; provided, further, that the use or consumption of such tangible personal property is necessary or essential to the performance of such publication business. This exemption does not include machinery, equipment, materials and supplies used in a manner that is incidental to the production of said publications, such as maintenance and janitorial equipment and supplies; nor does it include tangible personal property used in any activities other than the actual production of the publication and shall not include property such as office equipment and supplies, equipment and supplies used in selling and distributing activities, in research or in transportation activities; nor shall this exemption include motor vehicles or aircraft without regard to the use to which such motor vehicles or aircraft are put.

Provided, further, that this exemption shall apply when the publication referred to herein is distributed to the public free of charge.

Provided, further, that in order for the exemption to be applicable, at least ten percent (10%) of the total publication, computed on an average annual column inch basis, must be devoted to the publication of nonincome producing informative material.

§ 63-3622U. Funeral services.

There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale of tangible personal property relating to funeral services by a licensed funeral establishment.

§ 63-3622V. Bullion.

There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter:

The sale of precious metal bullion or the sale of monetized bullion.

For purposes of this section, “precious metal bullion” means any elementary precious metal which has been put through a process of smelting or refining including, but not limited to, gold, silver, platinum, rhodium, and chromium, and which is in such state or condition that its value depends upon its contents and not upon its form.

For purposes of this section, “monetized bullion” means coins or other forms of money manufactured from gold, silver, or other metals and heretofore, now, or hereafter used as a medium of exchange under the laws of this state, the United States, or any foreign nation, but shall not include coins or money sold to be manufactured into jewelry or works of art.

§ 63-3622W. Irrigation equipment and supplies.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter all sales of irrigation equipment and supplies to be used for agricultural production purposes, whether or not such equipment and supplies are to become a part of real estate and whether or not installed by the farmer, a contractor or subcontractor.

§ 63-3622X. Pollution control equipment.

There is hereby exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale, use or purchase of tangible personal property acquired and primarily used for the purpose of meeting air or water quality standards, rules or regulations of a state or federal agency having authority to regulate and set air or water quality emission standards.

The exemption provided in subsection (1) of this section applies to and includes:

The purchase of dry cleaning equipment that is designed to protect employees from exposure to perchloroethylene as well as retaining the fluid in the machine in order to protect sewer systems and air quality standards. Dry cleaning machines meeting these standards are referred to as “dry to dry transfer systems”;

The purchase of a liner or reagent required to meet water quality standards, rules or regulations of a state or federal agency having authority to regulate and set water quality standards regardless of whether the liner or reagent later becomes or is intended to become a component of any real property or improvement or fixture thereto;

The sale, use or purchase of tangible personal property that becomes a component, fixture or improvement to realty acquired and primarily used for the purpose of meeting air or water quality emission standards, rules or regulations when purchased by:

Manufacturing, mining or farming businesses that qualify for the exemption provided by section 63-3622D, Idaho Code, but not including property used to treat drinking water or to treat air or water that is not required for a production process;

Contractors working for manufacturing, mining or farming businesses that qualify for the exemption provided by section 63-3622D, Idaho Code, who purchase, use or install qualifying material at the direction of a project owner, but not including property used to treat drinking water or to treat air or water that is not required for a production process; or

Businesses principally devoted to treating and storing hazardous or toxic waste; and

Tangible personal property that is necessary for the operation of property that qualifies for the exemption available in paragraph (c) of this subsection.

The exemption provided in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to or include:

Motor vehicles or aircraft, without regard to the use to which such motor vehicles or aircraft are put;

The sale, use or purchase of fixtures, plumbing fixtures, pipe, pumps or other items used to treat or transport wastewater to a wastewater treatment plant that is owned by a wastewater operator as defined in section 54-2403, Idaho Code;

The sale, use or purchase of fixtures or tangible personal property that is used to treat or transport drinking water by a drinking water operator as defined in section 54-2403, Idaho Code;

The sale, use or purchase of property used to prevent soil erosion;

The sale, use or purchase of property that is affixed to realty and that is used in road construction or the construction of residential or commercial buildings or other improvements to realty owned by persons other than the businesses described in subsection (2)(c) of this section;

The sale, use or purchase of property used to construct buildings or structures that merely house pollution control equipment or a pollution control facility, including both building materials and construction equipment and including equipment used for excavation;

The sale, use or purchase of tangible personal property used to install pollution control equipment or facilities; or

The sale, use or purchase of tangible personal property that will become part of a septic tank or septic system.

§ 63-3622Y. Taxation of aerial passenger tramways and snowgrooming and snowmaking equipment.

There is hereby exempted from the taxes imposed in this chapter the sale, storage, use or other consumption of tangible personal property which is parts, material or equipment that will become a component of an aerial passenger tramway as defined in section 6-1102, Idaho Code, and snowgrooming and snowmaking equipment purchased and used by the owner or operator of a downhill ski area to prepare and maintain the downhill ski slopes accessed by aerial tramways.

§ 63-3622Z. Sales by Indian tribes.

There is hereby exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter sales occurring within the boundaries of an Indian reservation located in Idaho when the business or enterprise is wholly owned and operated by an Idaho Indian tribe identified in section 67-4001, Idaho Code.

As used in this section the word “reservation” means lands which are:

Indian lands federally declared to be reservations because they are reserved for Indian tribes by treaty between Indian tribes and any territorial governments, state government, or the United States Government; or, established by acts of the United States congress; or established by formal decision of the executive branch of the United States; or

Held by an Idaho Indian tribe not holding lands which meet the definition of subsection (2)(a) of this section and are tribal lands held in trust by the United States for the use and benefit of such tribe but not placed in trust after the effective date of this act.

§ 63-3622AA. Exemption for official documents. — (1) There is hereby exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale, purchase, or use of records, transcripts, deeds, licenses, reports, and other documents for which a fee, the amount of which is set by the Idaho Code, is imposed or charged.

(2) There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale, purchase, or use of public records requested pursuant to section 74-102, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3622BB. Research and development at the Idaho national laboratory. — There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter:

The sale or use of that property primarily or directly used or consumed in connection with research, development, experimental and testing activities, when exclusively financed by the United States in connection with the Idaho national laboratory and any successor thereto.

If a facility is used by the United States or one (1) of its management and operating contractors for research and development activities at the Idaho national laboratory and also is used by a person or persons in addition to the United States or one (1) of its management and operating contractors, there is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter a percentage of each sale or use of tangible personal property used or consumed at or for the benefit of the facility in the amount that the research and development activities of the United States or its management and operating contractors bear to the total use of the facility by all persons. The state tax commission shall adopt rules to govern the procedures for the calculation, verification and documentation of this allocation.

§ 63-3622CC. Railroad rolling stock. — There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale, storage, use or other consumption of tangible personal property which is railroad rolling stock rebuilt or remanufactured in this state and which was used in interstate commerce for at least three (3) consecutive months prior to such rebuilding or remanufacturing.

§ 63-3622DD. Parts for railroad rolling stock. — There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale, storage, use or other consumption of tangible personal property which is parts, material or equipment used to rebuild or remanufacture railroad rolling stock exempt from tax under section 63-3622CC, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3622EE. Purchases for the federal special supplemental food program for women, infants and children (WIC). — Commencing October 1, 1987, purchases of food pursuant to section 17 of the federal child nutrition act of 1966 and the school lunch and child nutrition amendment of 1986 are exempt from the taxes imposed by chapter 36, title 63, Idaho Code, and are exempt from the taxes that may be imposed on such purchases under the provisions of sections 50-1043 through 50-1049, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3622FF. Purchases made with SNAP benefit cards. — Purchases of food made with benefits provided under the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP) are exempt from the taxes imposed by chapter 36, title 63, Idaho Code, and are exempt from the taxes that may be imposed on such purchases under the provisions of sections 50-1043 through 50-1049, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3622GG. Aircraft. — There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter:

The sale, lease, purchase, or use of aircraft primarily used to provide passenger or freight services for hire as a common carrier only if:

The person operates the aircraft under the authority of the laws of this state, the United States or any foreign government; and

The aircraft is used to provide services indiscriminately to the public; and

The aircraft itself transports the person or property from one (1) location on the ground or water to another.

The sale, lease, purchase or use of aircraft primarily used for air ambulance services.

The sale, lease or purchase of aircraft for use outside this state by nonresidents, even though delivery be made within this state, but only when:

The aircraft will be taken from the point of delivery to a point outside this state;

The aircraft will not be used in this state more than ninety (90) days in any twelve (12) month period.

Repair and replacement materials and parts installed in or affixed or applied to, or sold, leased or purchased to be installed in or affixed or applied to, aircraft in connection with the remodeling, repair or maintenance of aircraft described under subsections (1), (2), (5), and (6) of this section and industry standard, federal aviation administration (FAA) approved materials, parts and components installed on nonresident privately owned aircraft by qualified employees of an FAA-approved Idaho repair station are exempt. Tools and equipment utilized in performing such remodeling, repair or maintenance are not exempt.

The sale, lease, purchase or use of fixed-wing aircraft primarily used as an air tactical group supervisor platform under contract with a governmental entity for wildfire activity.

The sale, lease, purchase, or use of aircraft primarily used for agricultural spraying, dusting, seeding, livestock and predatory animal control, or forest and wildlife conservation.